Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3210
Districts; change of boundaries, division, or merger; notice.

Within sixty days after such proposal for a change of boundaries, division, or merger is made and filed with the department, the department shall begin publication of the notices for a public hearing by the commission on the question. Notice requirements shall be satisfied by publishing such notice at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in the areas affected. A public hearing shall then be held as set forth in the notice and in accord with law and the rules and regulations of the commission.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 10, p. 106;

Laws 1988, LB 1045, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 53.